Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Eligibility; Application; Determination of Dividend.

Sec. 43.23.005.
Eligibility.

An individual is eligible to receive one permanent fund dividend each year in an amount to be determined under AS

43.23.025

if the individual

applies to the department;

is a state resident on the date of application;

was a state resident during the entire qualifying year;

has been physically present in the state for at least 72 consecutive hours at some time during the prior two years before the current dividend year;

is

a citizen of the United States;

an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States;

an alien with refugee status under federal law; or

an alien that has been granted asylum under federal law;

was, at all times during the qualifying year, physically present in the state or, if absent, was absent only as allowed in AS

43.23.008

; and

was in compliance during the qualifying year with the military selective service registration requirements imposed under 50 U.S.C. App. 453 (Military Selective Service Act), if those requirements were applicable to the individual, or has come into compliance after being notified of the lack of compliance.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 4 SLA 1992.]

A parent, guardian, or other authorized representative may claim a permanent fund dividend on behalf of an unemancipated minor or on behalf of a disabled or an incompetent individual who is eligible to receive a payment under this section. Notwithstanding (a)(2) — (4) of this section, a minor is eligible for a dividend if, during the two calendar years immediately preceding the current dividend year, the minor was born to or adopted by an individual who is eligible for a dividend for the current dividend year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) — (c) of this section, an individual is not eligible for a permanent fund dividend for a dividend year when

during the qualifying year, the individual was sentenced as a result of conviction in this state of a felony;

during all or part of the qualifying year, the individual was incarcerated as a result of the conviction in this state of a

felony; or

misdemeanor if the individual has been convicted of

a prior felony as defined in AS

11.81.900

; or

two or more prior misdemeanors as defined in AS

11.81.900

.

[Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991.]

The commissioner may waive the requirement of (a)(4) of this section for an individual absent from the state

in a time of national military emergency under military orders while serving in the armed forces of the United States, or for the spouse and dependents of that individual; or

while in the custody of the Department of Health and Social Services in accordance with a court order under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12 and placed outside of the state by the Department of Health and Social Services for purposes of medical or behavioral treatment.

For purposes of applying (d)(1) of this section, the date the court imposes a sentence or suspends the imposition of sentence shall be treated as the date of conviction. For purposes of applying (d)(2)(B) of this section, multiple convictions arising out of a single criminal episode shall be treated as a single conviction.

If an individual who would otherwise have been eligible for a permanent fund dividend dies after applying for the dividend but before the dividend is paid, the department shall pay the dividend to a personal representative of the estate or to a successor claiming personal property under AS

13.16.680

. If an individual who would otherwise have been eligible for a dividend and who did not apply for the dividend dies during the application period, a personal representative of the estate or a successor claiming personal property under AS

13.16.680

may apply for and receive the dividend. If an individual who received a dividend for the year immediately before the qualifying year and who would otherwise have been eligible for a dividend dies during the qualifying year after having been a state resident for at least 180 days immediately before the date of death, notwithstanding (a)(1) — (3) and (a)(6) of this section, a personal representative of the estate or a successor claiming personal property under AS 13.16.680 may apply for and receive the dividend. Notwithstanding AS

43.23.011

, an application for a dividend may be filed by the personal representative or the successor under this subsection at any time before the end of the application period for the next dividend year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 159 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 107 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1990; am §§ 46, 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1991; am §§ 4 — 8, 18 ch 4 SLA 1992; am §§ 2, 3 ch 46 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 44 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1998; am § 25 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 5 ch 89 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to eligibility and allowable absences during the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) public health disaster emergency declared by the governor on March 11, 2020, see § 16, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 46, SLA 1996 provides that the 1996 amendments that amended subsection (d) and added (g) “apply only to individuals convicted of crimes committed after December 31, 1996” and that “[c]onvictions for crimes committed before January 1, 1997, may not be considered in determining the number of prior convictions for purposes of applying AS

43.23.005(d)(2)(B)

.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the enactment of subsection (f) by § 1 ch. 68, SLA 1991 (HCS CSSB 98(FIN)), see 1991 Senate Journal, pages 256, 257.

Sec. 43.23.008.
Allowable absences.

Subject to (b) and (d) of this section, an otherwise eligible individual who is absent from the state during the qualifying year remains eligible for a current year permanent fund dividend if the individual was absent

receiving secondary or postsecondary education on a full-time basis;

receiving vocational, professional, or other specific education on a full-time basis for which, as determined by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education, a comparable program is not reasonably available in the state;

serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States or accompanying, as that individual’s spouse, minor dependent, or disabled dependent, an individual who is

serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States; and

eligible for a current year dividend;

serving under foreign or coastal articles of employment aboard an oceangoing vessel of the United States merchant marine;

receiving continuous medical treatment recommended by a licensed physician or convalescing as recommended by the physician who treated the illness if the treatment or convalescence is not based on a need for climatic change;

providing care for a parent, spouse, sibling, child, or stepchild with a critical life-threatening illness whose treatment plan, as recommended by the attending physician, requires travel outside the state for treatment at a medical specialty complex;

providing care for the individual’s terminally ill family member;

settling the estate of the individual’s deceased parent, spouse, sibling, child, or stepchild, provided the absence does not exceed 220 cumulative days;

serving as a member of the United States Congress;

serving on the staff of a member from this state of the United States Congress;

serving as an employee of the state in a field office or other location;

accompanying a minor who is absent under (5) of this subsection;

accompanying another eligible resident who is absent for a reason permitted under (1), (2), (5) — (12), (16), or (17) of this subsection as the spouse, minor dependent, or disabled dependent of the eligible resident;

serving as a volunteer in the federal peace corps program;

because of training or competing as a member of the United States Olympic Team or a United States national team for an Olympic sport;

participating for educational purposes in a student fellowship sponsored by the United States Department of Education or by the United States Department of State;

for any reason consistent with the individual’s intent to remain a state resident, provided the absence or cumulative absences do not exceed

180 days in addition to any absence or cumulative absences claimed under (3) of this subsection if the individual is not claiming an absence under (1), (2), or (4) — (16) of this subsection;

120 days in addition to any absence or cumulative absences claimed under (1) — (3) of this subsection if the individual is not claiming an absence under (4) — (16) of this subsection but is claiming an absence under (1) or (2) of this subsection; or

45 days in addition to any absence or cumulative absences claimed under (1) — (16) of this subsection if the individual is claiming an absence under (4) — (16) of this subsection.

An individual may not claim an allowable absence under (a)(1) — (16) of this section unless the individual was a resident of the state for at least six consecutive months immediately before leaving the state.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 33 SLA 2013.]

After an individual has been absent from the state for more than 180 days in each of the five preceding qualifying years, the department shall presume that the individual is no longer a state resident. The individual may rebut this presumption by providing clear and convincing evidence to the department that

the individual was physically present in the state for at least 30 cumulative days during the past five years; and

the individual is a state resident as defined in AS

43.23.295

.

To determine whether an individual intends to return and remain in the state indefinitely, the department shall consider all relevant factors, including

the length of time the individual was absent from the state compared to the length of time the individual was physically present in the state;

the frequency and duration of voluntary return trips to the state during the past five years;

whether the individual’s intent to return to and remain in the state is conditioned on future events beyond the individual’s control;

the ties the individual has established with the state or another jurisdiction, as demonstrated by

maintenance of a home;

payment of resident taxes;

registration of a vehicle;

registration to vote and voting history;

acquisition of a driver’s license, business license, or professional license; and

receipt of benefits under a claim of residency in the state or another jurisdiction;

the priority that the individual gave the state on an employment assignment preference list, including a list used by military personnel.

For purposes of (a)(7) of this section, “family member” means a person who is

legally related to the individual through marriage or guardianship; or

the individual’s sibling, parent, grandparent, son, daughter, grandson, granddaughter, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or first cousin.

History.

(§ 5 ch 44 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 116 SLA 2003; am §§ 20, 21 ch 42 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2008; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 33 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (f) and relettered in 2013, at which time former (d) was relettered as (f).

In 2018, “AS

43.23.295

” was substituted for “43.23.095” in paragraph (d)(2) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to allowable absences during the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) public health disaster emergency declared by the governor on March 11, 2020, see § 16, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 33, SLA 2013 the 2013 amendments to this section are retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.23.010.
Eligibility for permanent fund dividend. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.011.
Application period.

An application for a permanent fund dividend shall be filed during the period that begins January 1 and ends March 31 of that dividend year.

An otherwise eligible individual may apply for a current year dividend after March 31 of that year if the individual was eligible during the application period under (a) of this section for hostile fire or imminent danger pay while serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States. The individual must apply under this subsection within 90 days after the last day the individual was eligible for hostile fire or imminent danger pay. If the individual was eligible for hostile fire or imminent danger pay on March 31 of the current dividend year, the 90-day application period extension begins on the first day after March 31 that the individual was no longer eligible for the pay.

The commissioner may permit an individual to apply for a permanent fund dividend for any year after the application deadline under (a) or (b) of this section if the individual

at any time during the application period for that dividend established in (a) or (b) of this section,

served on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States; and

was eligible for hostile fire or imminent danger pay; and

demonstrates a reasonable cause for the delay in applying for that dividend.

History.

(§ 9 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 2004; am § 22 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision extending the application period for dividend year 2020, see § 10, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Sec. 43.23.015.
Application and proof of eligibility.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) for determining the eligibility of individuals for permanent fund dividends. The commissioner may require an individual to provide proof of eligibility, and the commissioner may use other information available from other state departments or agencies to determine the eligibility of an individual. The commissioner shall consider all relevant circumstances in determining the eligibility of an individual. However, the residency of an individual’s spouse may not be the principal factor relied upon by the commissioner in determining the residency of the individual.

The department shall prescribe and furnish an application form for claiming a permanent fund dividend. The application must include

notice of the penalties provided for under AS

43.23.270

;

a statement of eligibility and a certification of residency;

the means for an applicant eligible to vote under AS 15.05, or a person authorized to act on behalf of the applicant, to furnish information required by AS

15.07.060(a)(1)

— (4) and (7) — (9), and an attestation that such information is true.

Except as provided in (d) of this section or as may be provided by regulations adopted by the department, an individual must personally sign the application for permanent fund dividends, including the certification of residency required under (b) of this section.

The application and certification of residency of an unemancipated individual under 18 years of age or of a disabled or an incompetent individual must be signed by the individual’s parent, legal guardian, or other authorized representative. An individual may complete, sign, and file an application on behalf of a member of the armed forces of the United States who is serving on active duty outside of the United States if the individual has a power of attorney from the member of the armed forces that authorizes, in specific or general terms, the individual to file that application.

If a public agency claims a permanent fund dividend on behalf of an individual, the public agency shall hold the dividend in trust for the individual. Money held in trust under this subsection shall be invested by the commissioner in accordance with AS

37.10.070

.

A minor or a disabled or an incompetent individual may not maintain a claim against the state or an officer or employee of the state based on the manner in which the parent, guardian, or authorized representative other than a public agency of the state managed or disposed of permanent fund dividends received on behalf of the minor or disabled or incompetent individual.

If an individual is aggrieved by a decision of the department determining the individual’s eligibility for a permanent fund dividend or the individual’s authority to claim a permanent fund dividend on behalf of another, the individual may, upon payment of a $25 appeal fee, request the department to review its decision. Within 12 months after the administrative appeal is filed, the department shall provide the individual with a final written decision. If the individual is aggrieved by the decision of the department after all administrative proceedings, the individual may appeal that decision to the superior court in accordance with AS

44.62.560

. An appeal to the court under this section does not entitle the aggrieved individual to a trial de novo. The appeal shall be based on the record of the administrative proceeding from which appeal is taken and the scope of appeal is limited to matters contained in the record of the administrative proceeding. If, as a result of an administrative proceeding or a court appeal, the individual prevails, the $25 appeal fee shall be returned to the individual by the department.

The penalty and enforcement provisions of AS

43.23.270

apply to an individual who claims a permanent fund dividend on behalf of another.

An indigent individual may apply for a waiver of the appeal fee required under (g) of this section. The department shall prescribe and furnish a form for that purpose. The department shall grant the waiver if, during the year immediately preceding the year the form is submitted to the department, the individual was a member of a family with an income equal to or less than the federal poverty guidelines for Alaska set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

The application form for claiming a permanent fund dividend must include a place for the applicant to voluntarily indicate that the applicant is a veteran, the branch of service, including the Alaska Territorial Guard, and the dates of service. Notwithstanding AS

43.23.110

, the department shall release information provided under this subsection to the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs and may not otherwise release the information. The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may only release the information to congressionally chartered veterans service organizations in the state. The application form must contain notice that providing the information under this subsection is voluntary, that the information will be released as provided in this subsection, and that the veterans service organizations are not required to keep it confidential.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 159 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 107 SLA 1989; am §§ 2, 3 ch 68 SLA 1990; am § 47 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1991; am §§ 10, 11 ch 4 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 18 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 2008; am § 6, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.270

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.035

” in subsection (b) and (h) “AS

43.23.110

” was substituted for “43.23.017” in subsection (j) to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to (b), see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, in (b), deleted “and contain” at the beginning of (b)(2), added (b)(3), and made related changes.

Sec. 43.23.016.
Voter registration. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.101.]

Sec. 43.23.017.
Applicant information confidential. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.110.]

Sec. 43.23.020.
Proof of eligibility. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.021.
Delayed payment of certain dividends.

Notwithstanding other provisions regarding the payment of permanent fund dividends, if an individual is required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 and has not registered or has not completed the required periodic verifications or notices required under AS 12.63, payment of the dividend for that individual shall be delayed.

If payment of a dividend is delayed, the department shall notify the individual in writing of the delayed payment status, explain the requirements of this section, and request proof of registration and compliance with the verifications and notices required under AS 12.63. The dividend may not be paid unless, within one year after the notification, the department determines that the individual has registered and is in compliance with the verifications and notices required under AS 12.63.

The permanent fund dividend of an individual for whom payment has been delayed, but that remains payable under (b) of this section, is subject to levy, execution, garnishment, attachment, or any other remedy for the collection of debt. The department shall immediately pay that dividend, or the portion of it that has been claimed by a debtor, as provided in AS

43.23.140

—

43.23.170

.

If an individual for whom payment of a permanent fund dividend has been delayed but remains payable under (b) of this section dies before the dividend is paid or payable, the department shall pay the dividend to a personal representative of the individual’s estate.

The department shall include notice with the dividend application form of the requirements of (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 32 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140

—

43.23.170

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.065

—

43.23.068

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 43.23.025.
Amount of dividend.

By October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall determine the value of each permanent fund dividend for that year by

determining the total amount available for dividend payments, which equals

the amount of income of the Alaska permanent fund transferred to the dividend fund under AS

37.13.145(b)

during the current year;

plus the unexpended and unobligated balances of prior fiscal year appropriations that lapse into the dividend fund under AS

43.23.045(d)

;

less the amount necessary to pay prior year dividends from the dividend fund in the current year under AS

43.23.005(h)

,

43.23.021

, and

43.23.055

(3) and (7);

less the amount necessary to pay dividends from the dividend fund due to eligible applicants who, as determined by the department, filed for a previous year’s dividend by the filing deadline but who were not included in a previous year’s dividend computation;

less appropriations from the dividend fund during the current year, including amounts to pay costs of administering the dividend program and the hold harmless provisions of AS

43.23.240

;

determining the number of individuals eligible to receive a dividend payment for the current year and the number of estates and successors eligible to receive a dividend payment for the current year under AS

43.23.005(h)

; and

dividing the amount determined under (1) of this subsection by the amount determined under (2) of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 68 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 68 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 198 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 68 SLA 1991; am § 27 ch 134 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1998; am § 33 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.240

” was substituted for “43.23.075” in subparagraph (a)(1)(E) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Sec. 43.23.028.
Public notice.

By October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall give public notice of the value of each permanent fund dividend for that year and notice of the information required to be disclosed under (3) of this subsection. In addition, the stub attached to each individual dividend disbursement advice must

disclose the amount of each dividend attributable to income earned by the permanent fund from deposits to that fund required under art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska;

disclose the amount of each dividend attributable to income earned by the permanent fund from appropriations to that fund and from amounts added to that fund to offset the effects of inflation;

disclose the amount by which each dividend has been reduced due to each appropriation from the dividend fund, including amounts to pay the costs of administering the dividend program and the hold harmless provisions of AS

43.23.240

;

include a statement that an individual is not eligible for a dividend when

during the qualifying year, the individual was convicted of a felony;

during all or part of the qualifying year, the individual was incarcerated as a result of the conviction of a

felony; or

misdemeanor if the individual has been convicted of a prior felony or two or more prior misdemeanors;

include a statement that the legislative purpose for making individuals listed under (4) of this subsection ineligible is to

provide funds for services for and payments to crime victims and operating costs of the Violent Crimes Compensation Board;

provide funds to pay restitution owed to crime victims;

provide funds for grants to nonprofit organizations for services for crime victims and for mental health services and substance abuse treatment for offenders;

provide funds for the office of victims’ rights;

provide funds to the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault for grants for the operation of domestic violence and sexual assault programs; and

obtain reimbursement for some of the costs imposed on the Department of Corrections related to incarceration or probation of those individuals;

disclose the total amount that would have been paid during the previous fiscal year to individuals who were ineligible to receive dividends under AS

43.23.005(d)

if they had been eligible;

disclose the total amount transferred or appropriated for the current fiscal year under AS

43.23.048

for each of the accounts, funds, and agencies listed in AS

43.23.048

.

To the extent that amounts appropriated for a fiscal year do not exceed the total amount that would have been paid during the previous fiscal year to individuals who were ineligible to receive dividends under AS

43.23.005(d)

or under AS

43.23.021(b)

if they had been eligible, the notice requirements of (a)(3) of this section do not apply to transfers from the dividend fund to the restorative justice account (AS

43.23.048

).

History.

(§ 2 ch 198 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 44 SLA 1998; am § 26 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 175 SLA 2004; am § 34 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.240

” was substituted for “43.23.075” in paragraph (a)(3) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, rewrote (a)(5); in (a)(7), twice substituted “AS

43.23.048

” for “(b) of this section”, inserted “transferred or” following “the total amount”, inserted “accounts,” following “for each of these” and made a related change; rewrote (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that § 34, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (b) of this section to add a reference to AS

43.23.021(b)

, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent relating to the enactment of subsection (b) by § 3, ch. 68, SLA 1991 (HCS CSSB 98(FIN)), see 1991 House Journal, pages 1418 — 1419.

Sec. 43.23.030.
Amount of dividend. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.033.
Subpoena power. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.260.]

Sec. 43.23.035.
Penalties and enforcement. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.270.]